dictionaries/eu_ES/eu_ES.aff
FLAG num
SFX 36    0       ionean      .
SFX 36    0       ioneraino      .
SFX 36    0       ionerantz      .
SFX 36    0       ionerat      .
SFX 36    0       ionera      .
SFX 36    0       ionetik      .
SFX 36    0       ita      .
SFX 36    0       itako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxo/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoa/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoago/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoak/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoarekin/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoarendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoarentzat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoaren/238      .
SFX 36    0       itxoari/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoaz/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoegi/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoei/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoek/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoekin/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoen/238      .
SFX 36    0       itxoendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoentzat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoez/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxogatik/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxooi/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxook/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxookin/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoontzat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxootaz/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxooz/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoon/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxotzat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxok/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoz/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorekin/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorentzat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoren/238      .
SFX 36    0       itxori/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorik/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoan/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoko/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxoraino/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorantz/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxorat/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxora/243      .
SFX 36    0       itxotik/243      .
SFX 36    0       itzat      .
SFX 36    0       itzar      .
SFX 36    0       itzarra      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrago/243      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrak      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrarekin      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrarendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrarentzat      .
SFX 36    0       itzarraren/238      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrari      .
SFX 36    0       itzarraz      .
SFX 36    0       itzarregi      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrei      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrek      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrekin      .
SFX 36    0       itzarren/238      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrentzat      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrez      .
SFX 36    0       itzarroi      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrok      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrokin      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrontzat      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrotaz      .
SFX 36    0       itzarroz      .
SFX 36    0       itzarron      .
SFX 36    0       itzarri      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrik      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrean      .
SFX 36    0       itzarreko/243      .
SFX 36    0       itzarreraino      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrerantz      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrerat      .
SFX 36    0       itzarrera      .
SFX 36    0       itzarretik      .
SFX 36    0       itzargatik      .
SFX 36    0       itzartzat      .
SFX 36    0       ik      .
SFX 36    0       itaraino      .
SFX 36    0       itarantz      .
SFX 36    0       itarat      .
SFX 36    0       itara      .
SFX 36    0       itatik      .
SFX 36    0       itan      .
SFX 36    0       itarik      .
SFX 36    0       iz      .
SFX 36    0       izko/243      .
SFX 36    0       irekin      .
SFX 36    0       irekiko/243      .
SFX 36    0       iren/238      .
SFX 36    0       irendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       irentzat      .
SFX 36    0       irentzako/243      .
SFX 36    0       irena      .
SFX 36    0       irenak      .
SFX 36    0       irenarekin      .
SFX 36    0       irenarendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       irenarentzat      .
SFX 36    0       irenari      .
SFX 36    0       irenaz      .
SFX 36    0       irenei      .
SFX 36    0       irenek      .
SFX 36    0       irenekin      .
SFX 36    0       irenendako/243      .
SFX 36    0       irenentzat      .
SFX 36    0       irenetaraino      .
SFX 36    0       irenetarantz      .
SFX 36    0       irenetarat      .
SFX 36    0       irenetara      .
SFX 36    0       irenetatik      .
SFX 36    0       irenetan      .
SFX 36    0       irenetarik      .
SFX 36    0       irenez      .
SFX 36    0       irengan      .
SFX 36    0       irengana      .
SFX 36    0       irenganaino      .
SFX 36    0       irenganantz      .
SFX 36    0       irengandik      .
SFX 36    0       irengatik      .
SFX 36    0       irenoi      .
SFX 36    0       irenok      .
SFX 36    0       irenokin      .
SFX 36    0       irenontzat      .
SFX 36    0       irenotaz      .
SFX 36    0       irenoz      .
SFX 36    0       ireni      .
SFX 36    0       irenik      .
SFX 36    0       irenean      .
SFX 36    0       ireneraino      .
SFX 36    0       irenerantz      .
SFX 36    0       irenerat      .
SFX 36    0       irenera      .
SFX 36    0       irenetik      .
SFX 36    0       iregatik      .
SFX 36    0       iri      .
SFX 36    0       irik      .
SFX 36    0       iriko/243      .
SFX 36    0       ian      .
SFX 36    0       iraino      .
SFX 36    0       irantz      .
SFX 36    0       irat      .
SFX 36    0       ira      .
SFX 36    0       itik      .
SFX 36    tz       ztea      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteago/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteak      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearekin      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearekiko/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearendako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearentzat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearentzako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearen/238      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearena      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenak      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenarekin      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenarendako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenarentzat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenari      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenaz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenei      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenek      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenekin      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenendako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenentzat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetarantz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetarat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetara      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetatik      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetan      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetarik      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenez      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearengan      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearengana      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenganaino      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenganantz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearengandik      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearengatik      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenoi      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenok      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenokin      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenontzat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenotaz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenoz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetaraino      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenik      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenean      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteareneraino      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenerantz      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenerat      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenera      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearenetik      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteari      tz
SFX 36    tz       ztearren/238      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteaz      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteagan      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteagana      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteaganaino      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteaganantz      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteagandik      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteagatik      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteei      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteek      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteekin      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteekiko/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteendako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteentzat      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteentzako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteetako/243      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteetaraino      tz
SFX 36    tz       zteetarantz      tz
